es: Forma de mantillo: Astillas de corteza; Abono; Piedra triturada; Pepitas o trozos; Pellets; Agujas de pino; Pepitas de goma; Sábanas o tapetes; Triturado; Paja; Otros
de: Mulchform: Rindenstücke; Kompost; Schotter; Grobe Körnung; Pellets; Kiefernnadeln; Gummimulch; Folie oder Matten; Zerkleinert; Stroh; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Форма на мулча: Чипс от дървесни кори; Компост; Натрошен камък; Късчета или парчета; Пелети; Борови иглички; Гумени късчета; Листове или постелки; Настъргано; Слама; Друго
sv: Typ av marktäckning: Barkflis; Kompost; Krossad sten; Nuggets eller bitar; Pellets; Tallbarr; Gummibitar; Lakan eller mattor; Strimlad; Strå; Övrigt
pl: Forma ściółki: Kora; Kompost; Kruszywo kamienne; Bryłki / kawałki; Granulat; Igły sosnowe; Granulat gumowy; Maty / arkusze; Rozdrobniona; Słoma; Pozostałe
el: Μορφή εδαφοκάλυψης: Τσιπς φλοιού; Λίπασμα λιπασματοποίησης (κομπόστ); Θρυμματισμένη πέτρα; Νάγκετς ή κομμάτια; Σβόλοι; πευκοβελόνες; Καουτσούκ ψήγματα; Σεντόνια ή πατάκια; Ψιλοκομμένο; Άχυρο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Mulčovací tvar: Kôrové štiepky; Kompost; Drvený kameň; Hrudky alebo kúsky; Pelety; Ihličie; Gumové hrudky; Fólie alebo rohože; Drvené; Slamka; Iné
da: Barkflisform: Barkflis; Kompost; Knust sten; Nuggets eller chunks; Piller; Fyrrenåle; Gummiklumper; Lagner eller måtter; Makuleret; Strå; Andet
pt-PT: Forma da cobertura morta: Lasca de casca de árvore; Composto; Pedra britada; Tiras ou pedaços; Péletes; Agulhas de pinheiro; Tiras de borracha; Folhas ou tapetes; Triturado; Canudo; Outro
vi: Dạng màng phủ: Vỏ cây băm; Phân hữu cơ; Đá dăm; Dạng miếng hoặc khối nhỏ; Viên nén; Lá thông; Hạt cao su; Dạng tấm hoặc thảm; Dạng sợi nhỏ; Rơm rạ; Khác
hr-HR: Oblik malča: Komadići kore; Kompost; Drobljeni kamen; Komadići / krupni komadi; Peleti; Borove iglice; Gumeni komadići; Ploče/podloge; Usitnjeno; Slamka; Ostalo
tr: Malç formu: Ağaç kabuğu parçaları; Kompost; Kırma taş; Parça / blok; Pelet; Çam iğneleri; Kauçuk parçacıkları; Levha / mat; Kıyılmış; Saman malç; Diğer
th: รูปแบบของวัสดุคลุมดิน: เศษเปลือกไม้; ปุ๋ยหมัก; หินบด; แบบก้อนเล็กหรือก้อนใหญ่; เม็ดอัด; เข็มสน; ก้อนยาง; แบบแผ่นหรือแผ่นรอง; แบบสับฝอย; ฟาง; อื่นๆ
fi: Katteen muoto: Kuorihake; Kompostimulta; Kivimurska; Suuret palat; Pelletit; Männynneulaset; Suuret kumipalat; Arkit tai matot; Silputtu; Olki; Muu
hu: Mulcsforma: Kéregforgács; Komposzt; Zúzott kő; Rögök vagy darabok; Pelletek; Fenyőtűk; Gumi rögök; Lemezek vagy szőnyegek; Aprított; Szalma; Egyéb
ja: マルチの形態: 樹皮チップ; コンポスト; 砕石; ナゲットまたはチャンク; ペレット; 松葉; ゴムナゲット; シートまたはマット; 細断; 敷きわら; その他
zh-TW: 覆蓋物形式: 樹皮塊; 堆肥; 碎石; 塊狀物; 顆粒; 松針; 橡膠塊; 片狀; 刨絲狀; 稻草; 其他
ru: Форма мульчи: Щепки из коры; Компост; Щебень; Частицы или кусочки; Гранулы; Сосновые иголки; Резиновые гранулы; Листы или маты; Измельченный; Солома; Другое
fr: Forme du paillis: Copeaux d’écorce; Compost; Pierre concassée; Pépites ou morceaux; Granulés; Aiguilles de pin; Granulés de caoutchouc; Feuilles ou tapis; Déchiqueté; Paille; Autre
it: Forma di pacciame: scaglie di corteccia; Compost; Pietra frantumata; Nuggets o pezzi; Pellet; aghi di pino; pepite di gomma; Lenzuola o stuoie; Triturato; Paglia; Altro
ro-RO: Formă de mulci: Așchii de scoarță; Compost; Piatră zdrobită; Pepite sau bucăți; Pelete; Ace de pin; Pepite de cauciuc; Foi sau covoare; Mărunțit; Paie; Altele
ko: 멀치 형태: 바크 칩; 퇴비; 파쇄석; 너겟 또는 청크; 펠릿; 솔잎; 고무 너겟; 시트 또는 매트; 파쇄형; 빨대; 기타
cs: Podoba mulče: Kůrové štěpky; Kompost; Drcené kamenivo; Valounky nebo kusy; Pelety; Borovicové jehličí; Gumové valounky; Pláty nebo rohože; Drcený; Sláma; Jiné
nl: Mulchvorm: Boomschors; Compost; Gebroken steen; Nuggets of brokken; Pellets; Dennennaalden; Rubberen klompjes; Vellen of matten; Versnipperd; Rietje; Overig
en: Mulch form: Bark chips; Compost; Crushed stone; Nuggets or chunks; Pellets; Pine needles; Rubber nuggets; Sheets or mats; Shredded; Straw; Other
lt-LT: Mulčio forma: Žievės drožlės; Kompostas; Skalda; Gabalėliai arba stambūs gabalai; Gumulėliai; Pušų spygliai; Guminiai gabalėliai; Lakštai arba kilimėliai; Susmulkinta; Šiaudelis; Kita
sl-SI: Oblika zastirke: Lubje sekanci; Kompost; Drobljen kamen; Nuggets ali koščki; Peleti; Borove iglice; Gumijasti koščki; Rjuhe ali podloge; Razrezano; Slamica; Druga
pt-BR: Forma de cobertura vegetal morta: Lascas de casca; Adubo; Pedra britada; Grânulos ou pedaços; Pelotas; Agulhas de pinho; Grânulos de borracha; Chapas ou mantas; Triturador; Canudo; Outro
zh-CN: 覆盖物形态: 树皮碎屑; 堆肥; 碎石; 小块/颗粒; 颗粒; 松针; 橡胶颗粒; 床单或垫子; 碎末; 稻草; 其他
nb: Dekkbark-form: Barkflis; Kompost; Knust stein; Nuggets eller biter; Pellets; Furunåler; Gummibiter; Laken eller matter; Strimlet; Strå; Annet